Utah statutes.
20A-11-1305.   School board office candidate -- Failure to file statement --
Name not printed on ballot -- Filling vacancy.
(1) (a)  If a school board office candidate fails to file an interim report
due before the regular primary election, on August 31, and before the regular
general election, the chief election officer shall, after making a reasonable
attempt to discover if the report was timely mailed, inform the county clerk
and other appropriate election officials who:
(i)  shall, if practicable, remove the name of the candidate by blacking out
the candidate's name before the ballots are delivered to voters; or
(ii)  shall, if removing the candidate's name from the ballot is not
practicable, inform the voters by any practicable method that the candidate
has been disqualified and that votes cast for candidate will not be counted;
and
(iii)  may not count any votes for that candidate.
(b)  Any school board office candidate who fails to file timely a financial
statement required by this part is disqualified and the vacancy on the ballot
may be filled as provided in Section 20A-1-501.
(c)  Notwithstanding Subsections (1)(a) and (1)(b), a school board office
candidate is not disqualified if:
(i)  the candidate files the reports required by this section;
(ii)  those reports are completed, detailing accurately and completely the
information required by this part except for inadvertent omissions or
insignificant errors or inaccuracies; and
(iii)  those omissions, errors, or inaccuracies are corrected in an amended
report or in the next scheduled report.
(2) (a)  Within 30 days after a deadline for the filing of a summary report by
a candidate for state school board, the lieutenant governor shall review each
filed summary report to ensure that:
(i)  each state school board candidate that is required to file a summary
report has filed one; and
(ii)  each summary report contains the information required by this part.
(b)  If it appears that any state school board candidate has failed to file
the summary report required by law, if it appears that a filed summary report
does not conform to the law, or if the lieutenant governor has received a
written complaint alleging a violation of the law or the falsity of any
summary report, the lieutenant governor shall, within five days of discovery
of a violation or receipt of a written complaint, notify the state school
board candidate of the violation or written complaint and direct the state
school board candidate to file a summary report correcting the problem.
(c) (i)  It is unlawful for any state school board candidate to fail to file
or amend a summary report within 14 days after receiving notice from the
lieutenant governor under this section.
(ii)  Each state school board candidate who violates Subsection (2)(c)(i) is
guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(iii)  The lieutenant governor shall report all violations of Subsection
(2)(c)(i) to the attorney general.
(3) (a)  Within 30 days after a deadline for the filing of a summary report,
the county clerk shall review each filed summary report to ensure that:
(i)  each local school board candidate that is required to file a summary
report has filed one; and
(ii)  each summary report contains the information required by this part.
(b)  If it appears that any local school board candidate has failed to file
the summary report required by law, if it appears that a filed summary report
does not conform to the law, or if the county clerk has received a written
complaint alleging a violation of the law or the falsity of any summary
report, the county clerk shall, within five days of discovery of a violation
or receipt of a written complaint, notify the local school board candidate of
the violation or written complaint and direct the local school board candidate
to file a summary report correcting the problem.
(c) (i)  It is unlawful for any local school board candidate to fail to file
or amend a summary report within 14 days after receiving notice from the
county clerk under this section.
(ii)  Each local school board candidate who violates Subsection (3)(c)(i) is
guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(iii)  The county clerk shall report all violations of Subsection (3)(c)(i) to
the district or county attorney.
